Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.070

Contents of writ.

The writ of review must command the party to whom it is directed to certify fully to the court issuing the writ, at a specified time and place, a transcript of the record and proceedings (describing or referring to them with convenient certainty), that the same may be reviewed by the court, and requiring the party, in the meantime, to desist from further proceedings in the matter to be reviewed.

[ 1895 c 65 s 7; RRS s 1005.]